src/orthography/spellrelax.xfscript
!# Explanation:
!# lexical side (->) input 
!aka
!# normative (->) descriptive

!natural classes
define nonsyl   [b|d|g|p|t|k|m|n|s (h)|z (h)|j|c h|w|y|h]; 
define pluscons [b|d|g|p|t|k|m|n|s (h)|z (h)|j|c h]; 
define noncont  [b|d|g|p|t|k|m|n|j|c h]; 
define nas      [n|m];
define lenis    [b|d|g|z (h)|j];
define lenstp   [b|d|g];
define fortis   [p|t|k|s (h)|c];
define vowel    [a (a)|i (i)|o (o)|e]; 

!##respectable phonological rules that leak into spelling
define lower    [o (->) a || \[o] _ .#.] ; 
define findevoi [
                    b (->) p,
                    d (->) t ,
                    g (->) k ,
                    z (->) s ,
                    z h (->) s h , 
                    j (->) c h 
                    ||  _ .#.
                ] ; !Valentine 2001 p 74 
define nasassim [
                    nas (->) m || _ [b|p] ,,
                    nas (->) n || _ [d|t|s|z|j|c|g|k] !unknown whether m undergoes
                ] ; !Valentine 2001 p 73 !need to consider application over '
define lenassim [       
                    b (->) m || _ nas ,, 
                    [d|g] (->) n || _ nas  !for completeness, out on a limb with [g]
                ] ; !first step in waabndaan -> waammdaan -> waamdaan (Valentine 2001 p 74)
define nasdel [[n|m] (->) 0 || [.#.|noncont] _ noncont];
define fortite  [
                    b b (->) p ,
                    d d (->) t ,
                    g g (->) k ,
                    z z (->) s ,
                    z h z h (->) s h ,
                    j j (->) c h
                ] ; !Valentine 2001 p 76
define drophomorg   [
                        b (->) 0 || _ [b|p], p _ ,,   !Valentine 2001 p 78 (b at top)
                        d (->) 0 || _ [d|t], t _ ,,
                        g (->) 0 || _ [g|k], k _ ,,
                        z (->) 0 || _ [z|s](h), s (h) _ ,,
                        z h (->) 0 || _ [[z|s] h], s h _ ,,
                        p (->) 0 || _ p ,,              !on limb: simplify other gem
                        t (->) 0 || _ t ,,              
                        k (->) 0 || _ k ,,              
                        s (->) 0 || _ s ,,              
                        s h (->) 0 || _ s h ,,              
                        m (->) 0 || _ m ,,              
                        n (->) 0 || _ n ,,              
                        w (->) 0 || _ w ,,              
                        y (->) 0 || _ y
                    ] ; 
define clustdevoi   [
                        b (->) p,
                        d (->) t,
                        g (->) k,
                        z (->) s,
                        z h (->) s h,
                        j (->) c h
                                    || _ fortis
                    ] ; !Valentine 2001 p 80
define initdel  [nonsyl (->) 0 || .#. _ pluscons] ; !Valentine 2001 p 81
define glotdel  [h (->) 0 || pluscons _ , _ pluscons] ; 
!skipped diphtongization (Curve Lake ehi -> ey), denasalization (mt->bt) V 2001 p 82
define wy       [w (->) y || vowel _ vowel] ; !Valentine 2001 p 88
define glidedel [[w|y] (->) 0 || pluscons _, _ pluscons] ; !Valentine 2001 p 88
!a vs i vs o variation currently spelled into lexicon

!##people don't know how to use apostrophes
define aposvar  [                   !probably want non-ascii single quotes too
                    [..] (->) ',
                    '   (->) 0 
                                || nonsyl _ nonsyl 
                ] ; 

define dummy [a -> a];
read regex [
dummy
!lower       .o.
!findevoi    .o.
!nasassim    .o.
!lenassim    .o.
!nasdel      .o.
!fortite     .o.
!drophomorg  .o.
!clustdevoi  .o.
!initdel     .o.
!glotdel     .o.
!wy          .o.
!glidedel    .o.
!aposvar     
] ; 
